Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2516
Commission on Indian Affairs Cash
Fund; created; use; investment.

The Commission on Indian
Affairs Cash Fund is created. The fund shall be administered by the Commission
on Indian Affairs. The fund shall consist of money from contracts, fees, grants, or gifts from nonfederal
sources received by the state and
any investment income earned on the fund. The fund may be used to support
the commission's operations pursuant to sections 81-2501 to 81-2508. The Department
of Administrative Services may for accounting purposes create subfunds of
the fund to segregate awards or allocations received. Any money in the fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act.

Laws 2013, LB199, § 15;

Laws 2014, LB906, § 21.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.